Illinois, session 104th, HB810.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Use Tax Act is amended by changing Section 1 5as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 105/1)  (from Ch. 120, par. 439.1)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8"Use Tax Act". 9(Source: Laws 1955, p. 2027.)